Wyoming statutes. Title 21 Education
Article 2. Superintendent Of Public Instruction And Department Of Education

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

78 C.J.S. Schools and School Districts § 81.

Laws 2015, ch. 30

, amending provisions of this article, states in relevant part: “in accordance with
Powers v. State, 2014 WY 15, 318 P.3d 300 (Wyo. 2014) and Powers v. State, No. 180-673 (1st Jud. Dist. Ct. Apr. 18, 2014)”.

Laws 2015, ch. 179

, amending provisions of this article, states in relevant part: “conforming
Wyoming Statute to Powers v. State, 2014 WY 15, 318 P.3d 300 and Powers v. State, No. 180-673 (1st Jud. Dist. Ct. Apr. 18, 2014).”

§ 21-2-201.
General supervision of public schools entrusted to state superintendent.

The general supervision of the public schools shall be entrusted to the state superintendent who shall be the administrative head and chief executive officer of the department of education.

and (c) Repealed by Laws 2015, ch. 30 § 4.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 103, § 2; R.S. 1887, § 3906; R.S. 1899, § 91; C.S. 1910, § 133; Laws 1919, ch. 127, § 5; C.S. 1920, §§ 142, 2332; R.S. 1931, §§ 99-105, 109-701; C.S. 1945, §§ 18-601, 67-105; W.S. 1957, §§ 9-84, 21-5; Laws 1959, ch. 109, § 2; 1969, ch. 111, § 9; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21.1-9; 2013 ch. 1, § 2, effective January 29, 2013; 2014 ch. 103, § 1, effective July 1, 2014; 2015 ch. 30, §§
1, 3, 4, effective February 25, 2015.

The 2013 amendment,

substituted “as prescribed by law” for “who shall be the administrative head and chief executive officer of the department of education” in (a); and added (b) through (c).

Laws 2013, ch. 1, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved January 29, 2013.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, in (c)(ii), deleted “and capable of serving on the board under W.S.

21-22-103

” following “of the award.”

The 2015 amendment,

in (a), substituted “who shall be the administrative head and chief executive officer of the department of education” for “as prescribed by law.”; and repealed former (b) and (c), pertaining to administrative responsibilities of the state superintendent.

Laws 2015, ch. 30, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 25, 2015.